Nebraska, session 109, LB1025.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1025 LB1025
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Social Media Collection of Consumer Data Tax Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Social Media Collection of Consumer
Data Tax Act:
(1) Any term shall have the same meaning as used in Chapter 77,
article 27, except as otherwise defined in the Social Media Collection of
Consumer Data Tax Act;
(2) Consumer means an individual who establishes an account on an
app or website owned by a social media platform business whose consumer
data is collected by the social media platform business regardless of
whether the individual is charged for establishing the account;
(3) Consumer data means any information that identifies, relates to,
describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be
linked with a consumer, whether directly submitted to the social media
platform business by the consumer or derived from other sources;
(4) Internet protocol address means a unique string of characters or
other identifier assigned to each device connected to a network for
communication;
(5) Nebraska consumer means a consumer who is a resident individual
as defined in section 77-2714.01;
(6) Social media platform means an electronic medium, including a
browser-based or application-based interactive computer service, Internet
website, telephone network, or data network, that allows an account
holder to create, share, and view user-generated content for a
substantial purpose of social interaction, sharing user-generated
content, or personal networking. Social media platform does not include:
(a) An Internet search provider;
(b) An Internet service provider;
(c) An email service;
(d) A streaming service, online video game, e-commerce, or other
Internet website where the content is not user generated but where
-2-

LB1025 LB1025
2026 2026
interactive functions enable chat, comments, reviews, or other
interactive functionality that is incidental to, directly related to, or
dependent upon providing the content;
(e) A communication service, including text, audio, or video
communication technology, provided by a business to the business's
employees and clients for use in the course of business activities and
not for public distribution, except that social media platform includes a
communication service provided by a social media platform;
(f) An advertising network with the sole function of delivering
commercial content;
(g) A telecommunications carrier as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153;
(h) A broadband Internet access service as defined in 47 C.F.R.
8.1(b);
(i) Single-purpose community groups for education or public safety;
(j) Teleconferencing or video-conferencing services that allow
reception and transmission of audio and video signals for real-time
communication, except that social media platform includes
teleconferencing or video-conferencing services provided by a social
media platform;
(k) Cloud computing services, which may include cloud storage and
shared document collaboration;
(l) Providing or obtaining technical support for a platform,
product, or service; or
(m) A platform designed primarily and specifically for creative
professional users, as distinct from the general public, to share their
portfolio and creative content, engage in professional networking,
acquire clients, and market the creative professional user's creative
content and creative services through facilitated transactions; and
(7) Social media platform business means a for-profit entity that
operates a social media platform that engages, collects, maintains, uses,
processes, sells, or shares consumer data in support of the entity's
-3-

LB1025 LB1025
2026 2026
business activities.
Sec. 3. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, an excise tax is imposed on
the collection of consumer data by a social media platform business as
provided in this section.
(2) The tax is imposed on social media platform businesses based on
the number of Nebraska consumers from whom a social media platform
business collects consumer data within a month as follows:
Nebraska Consumers Tax
Fewer than or equal to 50,000 Zero
Over 50,000 but not more than $0.10 per month on the number of
250,000 Nebraska consumers over 50,000 but
not more than 250,000;
Over 250,000 but not more than $40,000 plus $0.25 per month on the
500,000 number of Nebraska consumers over
250,000 but not more than 500,000;
and
Over 500,000 $165,000 plus $0.50
per month on the number of Nebraska
consumers over 500,000.
(3) All taxes collected under this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Juvenile Mental Health Support Fund.
Sec. 4. (1) Until the contrary is established, it is presumed that
a consumer whose information on record with or available to a social
media platform business indicates a Nebraska home address, a Nebraska
mailing address, or an Internet protocol address connected with a
Nebraska location is a Nebraska consumer for purposes of the Social Media
Collection of Consumer Data Tax Act. The burden of proving that a
consumer is not a Nebraska consumer is on the social media platform
business.
(2) A Nebraska consumer must be counted only once per social media
platform in the calculation of the monthly tax imposed on a social media
-4-

LB1025 LB1025
2026 2026
platform business.
(3) A social media platform business that has paid tax under the
Social Media Collection of Consumer Data Tax Act may claim a credit
against the tax paid with respect to a Nebraska consumer if another state
imposes an excise tax identical to the tax imposed under the act with
respect to the same consumer.
(4) Business entities that are part of a controlled group of
corporations as defined in section 1563(a) of the Internal Revenue Code
shall be treated as a single entity for purposes of meeting the
definition of a social media platform business under the Social Media
Collection of Consumer Data Tax Act.
(5) The single member of a single member limited liability company
shall be treated as a consumer under this section.
Sec. 5. A social media platform business must report the tax on a
return prescribed by the Tax Commissioner and must remit the tax in a
form and manner prescribed by the Tax Commissioner. The return and the
tax must be filed and paid using the filing cycle and due dates provided
for sales and use taxes imposed under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
Sec. 6. (1) The provisions of sections 77-2714 to 77-27,135
relating to deficiencies, penalties, interest, the collection of
delinquent amounts, confidentiality, refunds, and appeal procedures for
the tax imposed by section 77-2734.02 shall also apply to the tax imposed
by section 3 of this act.
(2) A social media platform business shall maintain records as
required by the Tax Commissioner.
Sec. 7. The Juvenile Mental Health Support Fund is hereby created.
The fund shall be administered by the Department of Health and Human
Services and shall consist of money transferred pursuant to subsection
(3) of section 3 of this act. Any money in the Juvenile Mental Health
Support Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
-5-

LB1025 LB1025
2026 2026
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The fund shall be used by the
department for the programming and facilities associated with providing
juvenile mental health services.
Sec. 8. The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out the Social Media Collection of
Consumer Data Tax Act.
-6-